fi: Kauhan pinnan muotoilu: Rei'itetty; Uritettu; Kiinteä; Muu
sk-SK: Dizajn povrchu naberačky: Perforovaný; Štrbinový; Pevný; Iné
nb: Utforming av overflaten på en forsyingsskje: Perforert; Spaltet; Fast; Annet
fr: Conception de la surface de la pelle à frites: Perforé; Fendu; Solide; Autre
es: Diseño de la superficie de la cuchara: Perforado; Ranurado; Sólido; Otros
hr-HR: Dizajn površine žlice grabilice: Perforirani; S utorima; Čvrsti; Ostalo
en: Scoop surface design: Perforated; Slotted; Solid; Other
pt-BR: Design da superfície da concha: Perfurado; Perfurado; Maciço; Outro
sv: Skopytans design: Perforerad; Slitsad; Solid; Annat
ja: スクープ表面のデザイン: ミシン目; スロット付き; ソリッド; その他
sl-SI: Zasnova površine zajemalke: Perforirana; Ploščate; Trden; Druga
nl: Schepopervlak-ontwerp: Geperforeerd; Sleuven; Stevig; Overig
hu: Kanál felületének kialakítása: Perforált; Hornyolt; Szilárd; Egyéb
pl: Typ powierzchni czerpaka: Perforowane; Szczelinowe; Pełne; Inne
zh-TW: 杓面設計: 穿孔式; 開槽式; 實心; 其他
de: Schaufeloberflächendesign: Perforiert; Geschlitzt; Solide; Sonstiges
da: Skeoverfladedesign: Perforeret; Slidset; Solid; Andet
pt-PT: Design da superfície da colher: Perfurado; Com ranhura; Sólido; Outro
tr: Kepçe yüzey tasarımı: Perfore; Oluklu; Düz; Diğer
vi: Thiết kế bề mặt muỗng: Đục lỗ; Có lỗ; Lốp rắn; Khác
bg-BG: Дизайн на повърхността на лъжичката: Перфорирано; За отцеждане; Плътно; Друго
lt-LT: Samtelio paviršiaus tipas: Perforuotas; Su grioveliais; Kietas; Kita
ko: 스쿱 표면 디자인: 구멍 뚫림; 슬롯형; 솔리드; 기타
th: การออกแบบพื้นผิวของกระบวยตัก: แบบเจาะรู; เจาะรู; แผ่นตัน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Designul suprafeței lingurii: Perforat; Cu fante; Solid; Altele
cs: Konstrukce povrchu naběračky: Perforovaný povrch; Drážkovaný povrch; Plný povrch (bez perforací); Jiné
zh-CN: 勺子表面设计: 带孔; 带槽; 实心; 其他
ru: Конструкция поверхности совка: Перфорированный; С прорезями; Цельный; Другой
el: Σχεδιασμός επιφάνειας σέσουλας: Διάτρητη; Με σχισμές; Συμπαγής; Άλλο
it: Design della superficie della paletta: Perforata; A fessura; Solido; Altro